10-K 1 shw-12312018x10k.htm 10-K
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018
Commission file number 1-04851
THE SHERWIN-WILLIAMS COMPANY
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
OHIO   34-0526850
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization)   (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
101 West Prospect Avenue, Cleveland, Ohio   44115-1075
(Address of principal executive offices)   (Zip Code)
(216) 566-2000
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class   Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, Par Value $1.00   New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
None
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes  x        No  o
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act.        Yes  o        No  x
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant: (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements
for the past 90 days.        Yes  x        No  o
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of
Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to submit such
files).        Yes  x        No  o
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K (§ 229.405 of this chapter) is not contained herein, and will
not be contained, to the best of Registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any
amendment to this Form 10-K.         o
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an
emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and "emerging growth company" in
Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one:)
Large accelerated filer x Accelerated filer o
Non-accelerated filer o Smaller reporting company o
Emer ging growth company o  
          
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or
revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.    o  
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).         Yes  o        No  x
At January 31, 2019, 92,718,270 shares of common stock were outstanding, net of treasury shares. The aggregate market value of common stock held by non-
affiliates of the Registrant at June 30, 2018 was $37,995,087,928 (computed by reference to the price at which the common stock was last sold on such date).
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of our Annual Report to Shareholders for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018 (“2018 Annual Report”) are incorporated by reference into Parts I,
II and IV of this report.
Portions of our Proxy Statement for the 2019 Annual Meeting of Shareholders (“Proxy Statement”) to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
within 120 days of our fiscal year ended December 31, 2018 are incorporated by reference into Part III of this report.
THE SHERWIN-WILLIAMS COMPANY
Table of Contents
 
   Page
PART I
Item 1. Business 1
 Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Information 4
Item 1A. Risk Factors 5
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 12
Item 2. Properties 13
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 14
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 14
 Executive Officers of the Registrant 14
 
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities 16
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 17
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations 17
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 17
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 18
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure 18
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 18
Item 9B. Other Information 18
 
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 19
Item 11. Executive Compensation 19
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 20
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 20
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 20
 
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 21
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 27
 Signatures 28
PART I
ITEM 1.    BUSINESS
Introduction
The Sherwin-Williams Company, founded in 1866 and incorporated in Ohio in 1884, is engaged in the development,
manufacture, distribution and sale of paint, coatings and related products to professional, industrial, commercial and retail
customers primarily in North and South America with additional operations in the Caribbean region, Europe, Asia and Australia.
Our principal executive offices are located at 101 West Prospect Avenue, Cleveland, Ohio 44115-1075, telephone (216) 566-2000.
As used in this report, the terms “Sherwin-Williams,” “Company,” “we” and “our” mean The Sherwin-Williams Company and its
consolidated subsidiaries unless the context indicates otherwise.
Available Information
We make available free of charge on or through our website our Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on
Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to these reports, as soon as reasonably practicable after we
electronically file such material with, or furnish such material to, the Securities and Exchange Commission. You may access these
documents on the “Investor Relations” page of our website at www.sherwin.com.
We also make available free of charge on our website our Corporate Governance Guidelines, our Director Independence
Standards, our Code of Conduct and the charters of our Audit Committee, our Compensation and Management Development
Committee and our Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee. You may access these documents in the “Corporate
Governance” section on the “Investor Relations” page of our website at www.sherwin.com.
Basis of Reportable Segments
The Company reports its segment information in the same way that management internally organizes its business for
assessing performance and making decisions regarding allocation of resources in accordance with the Segment Reporting Topic of
the Accounting Standards Codification (ASC). The Company has three reportable operating segments: The Americas Group,
Consumer Brands Group and Performance Coatings Group (individually, a "Reportable Segment" and collectively, the “Reportable
Segments”). Factors considered in determining the three Reportable Segments of the Company include the nature of business
activities, the management structure directly accountable to the Company’s chief operating decision maker (CODM) for operating
and administrative activities, availability of discrete financial information and information presented to the Board of Directors. The
Company reports all other business activities and immaterial operating segments that are not reportable in the Administrative
segment. For more information about the Reportable Segments, see pages 8 through 15 of our 2018 Annual Report, which is
incorporated herein by reference.
The Company’s CODM has been identified as the Chief Executive Officer because he has final authority over performance
assessment and resource allocation decisions. Because of the diverse operations of the Company, the CODM regularly receives
discrete financial information about each Reportable Segment as well as a significant amount of additional financial information
about certain divisions, business units or subsidiaries of the Company. The CODM uses all such financial information for
performance assessment and resource allocation decisions. The CODM evaluates the performance of and allocates resources to the
Reportable Segments based on profit or loss before income taxes and cash generated from operations. The accounting policies of
the Reportable Segments are the same as those described in Note 1 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on pages 45
through 49 of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
The Americas Group
The Americas Group consisted of 4,696 company-operated specialty paint stores in the United States, Canada, Latin America
and the Caribbean region at December 31, 2018. Each store in this segment is engaged in servicing the needs of architectural and
industrial paint contractors and do-it-yourself homeowners. The Americas Group company-owned stores market and sell Sherwin-
Williams® and other controlled brand architectural paint and coatings, protective and marine products, OEM product finishes and
related products. The majority of these products are produced by manufacturing facilities in the Consumer Brands Group. In
addition, each store sells select purchased associated products. In addition to our stores in the Latin America region, The Americas
Group meets regional customer demands through developing, licensing, manufacturing, distributing and selling a variety of
architectural paints, coatings and related products in North and South America. The loss of any single customer would not have a
material adverse effect on the business of this segment. At December 31, 2018, The Americas Group consisted of operations from
subsidiaries in 10 foreign countries. During 2018, this segment opened 76 net new stores, consisting of 91 new stores opened (74 in
the United States, 16 in Canada, and 1 in South America) and 15 stores closed (1 in the United States, 2 in Canada, 11 in South
America and 1 in Mexico). In 2017 and 2016, this segment opened 101 and 142 net new stores, respectively. A map on the cover
flap of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference, shows the number of paint stores and their geographic
location. The CODM uses discrete financial information about
1
The Americas Group, supplemented with information by geographic region, product type and customer type, to assess performance
of and allocate resources to The Americas Group as a whole. In accordance with ASC 280-10-50-9, The Americas Group as a
whole is considered the operating segment, and because it meets the criteria in ASC 280-10-50-10, it is also considered a
Reportable Segment.
Consumer Brands Group
The Consumer Brands Group supplies a broad portfolio of branded and private-label architectural paint, stains, varnishes,
industrial products, wood finishes products, wood preservatives, applicators, corrosion inhibitors, aerosols, caulks and adhesives to
retailers and distributors throughout North America, as well as in Australia, New Zealand, China and Europe. The Consumer
Brands Group also supports the Company's other businesses around the world with new product research and development,
manufacturing, distribution and logistics. Approximately 55.82% of the total sales of the Consumer Brands Group in 2018 were
intersegment transfers of products primarily sold through The Americas Group. At December 31, 2018, the Consumer Brands
Group consisted of operations in the United States and subsidiaries in 6 foreign countries, including company-operated outlets in
Australia and New Zealand. A map on the cover flap of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference, shows
the number of company-operated outlets and their location. Sales and marketing of certain controlled brand and private-label
products is performed by a direct sales staff. The products distributed through third-party customers are intended for resale to the
ultimate end-user of the product. The Consumer Brands Group had sales to certain customers that, individually, may be a
significant portion of the sales of the segment. However, the loss of any single customer would not have a material adverse effect
on the overall profitability of the segment. This segment incurred most of the Company’s capital expenditures related to ongoing
environmental compliance measures at sites currently in operation. The CODM uses discrete financial information about the
Consumer Brands Group, supplemented with information by product type and customer type, to assess performance of and allocate
resources to the Consumer Brands Group as a whole. In accordance with ASC 280-10-50-9, the Consumer Brands Group as a
whole is considered the operating segment, and because it meets the criteria in ASC 280-10-50-10, it is also considered a
Reportable Segment.
Performance Coatings Group
The Performance Coatings Group develops and sells industrial coatings for wood finishing and general industrial (metal and
plastic) applications, automotive refinish, protective and marine coatings, coil coatings, packaging coatings and performance-based
resins and colorants worldwide. This segment licenses certain technology and trade names worldwide. Sherwin-Williams® and
other controlled brand products are distributed through The Americas Group and this segment’s 282 company-operated branches
and by a direct sales staff and outside sales representatives to retailers, dealers, jobbers, licensees and other third-party distributors.
The Performance Coatings Group had sales to certain customers that, individually, may be a significant portion of the sales of the
segment. However, the loss of any single customer would not have a material adverse effect on the overall profitability of the
segment. During 2018, this segment opened 3 new branches and closed 11 branches for a net decrease of 8 branches. At
December 31, 2018, the Performance Coatings Group consisted of operations in the United States and subsidiaries in 45 foreign
countries. The CODM uses discrete financial information about the Performance Coatings Group, supplemented with information
about geographic divisions, business units and subsidiaries, to assess performance of and allocate resources to the Performance
Coatings Group as a whole. In accordance with ASC 280-10-50-9, the Performance Coatings Group as a whole is considered the
operating segment, and because it meets the criteria in ASC 280-10-50-10, it is also considered a Reportable Segment. A map on
the cover flap of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference, shows the number of branches and their
geographic locations.
Administrative Segment
The Administrative segment includes the administrative expenses of the Company’s corporate headquarters site. Also
included in the Administrative segment is interest expense, interest and investment income, certain expenses related to closed
facilities and environmental-related matters, and other expenses which are not directly associated with the Reportable Segments.
The Administrative segment does not include any significant foreign operations. Also included in the Administrative segment is a
real estate management unit that is responsible for the ownership, management, and leasing of non-retail properties held primarily
for use by the Company, including the Company’s headquarters site, and disposal of idle facilities. Sales of this segment represent
external leasing revenue of excess headquarters space or leasing of facilities no longer used by the Company in its primary
businesses. Material gains and losses from the sale of property are infrequent and not a significant operating factor in determining
the performance of the Administrative segment.
Business Developments
For additional information regarding our business and business developments, see pages 8 through 15 of our 2018 Annual
Report and the “Letter to Shareholders” on pages 2 through 7 of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by
reference.
2
Raw Materials and Products Purchased for Resale
We believe we generally have adequate sources of raw materials and fuel supplies used in our business. There are sufficient
suppliers of each product purchased for resale that none of the Reportable Segments anticipate any significant sourcing problems
during 2019. See Item 1A Risk Factors for more information regarding cost and sourcing of raw materials.
Seasonality
The majority of the sales for the Reportable Segments traditionally occur during the second and third quarters. There is no
significant seasonality in sales for the Administrative segment.
Working Capital
In order to meet increased demand during the second and third quarters, the Company usually builds its inventories during
the first quarter. Working capital items (inventories and accounts receivable) are generally financed through short-term borrowings,
which include the use of lines of credit and the issuance of commercial paper. For a description of the Company’s liquidity and
capital resources, see pages 25 through 30 of our 2018 Annual Report under the caption “Financial Condition, Liquidity and Cash
Flow” of “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,” which is incorporated herein
by reference.
Trademarks and Trade Names
Customer recognition of our trademarks and trade names collectively contribute significantly to our sales. The major
trademarks and trade names used by each of the Reportable Segments are set forth below.
•The Americas Group:    Sherwin-Williams®, A-100®, Cashmere®, Colorgin®, Condor®, Duracraft®, Duration Home®,
Duration®, Emerald®, Harmony®, HGTV Home® by Sherwin- Williams, Kem Pro®, Kem Tone®, Krylon®, Loxon®,
Marson®, Metalatex®, Minwax®, Novacor®, Paint Shield®, PrepRite®, ProClassic®, ProCraft ®, ProConstructor®,
ProIndustrial™, ProMar®, ProPark®, Solo®, Sumaré®, SuperDeck®, SuperPaint®, Ultra Proteccion®, Woodscapes®
•Consumer Brands Group:    Accurate Dispersions™, Altax™, Bestt Liebco®, Cabot®, Conco®, Duckback®, Dupli-
Color®, DuraSeal®, Dutch Boy®, Geocel®, Granosite®, H&C®, HGTV HOME® by Sherwin-Williams, Huarun™, Kool
Seal®, Krylon®, Minwax®, Pratt & Lambert®, Purdy®, Ronseal™, Rubberset®, Solver®, Sprayon®, SuperDeck®,
Thompson’s® WaterSeal®, Tri-Flow®, Uniflex®, Valspar®, VHT®, Wattyl®, White Lightning®
•Performance Coatings Group:    Sherwin-Williams®, Acrolon®, AcromaPro®, Arti™, ATX™, AWX Performance Plus™,
Baco®, Conely®, DeBeer®, DFL™, Dimension®, Duraspar™, Envirolastic®, Euronavy®, Excelo®, Fastline®, Finish
1™, Firetex®, Fluropon®, Genesis®, Heat-Flex®, House of Kolor®, Huarun™, Inchem®, Inver®, Kem Aqua®, Lanet™,
Lazzuril®, Macropoxy®, Magnalux™, Martin Senour®, Matrix®, ML Campbell®, Oece™, PermaClad®, Planet Color®,
Polane®, Powdura®, Prospray®, Sayerlack®, Sher-Wood®, Ultra-Cure®, Ultra™, USC®, ValPure® V70, Valspar®,
Wattyl®
Patents
Although patents and licenses are not of material importance to our business as a whole or any segment, The Americas Group
and the Performance Coatings Group derive a portion of their income from the licensing of technology, trademarks and trade names
to foreign companies.
Backlog and Productive Capacity
Backlog orders are not significant in the business of any Reportable Segment since there is normally a short period of time
between the placing of an order and shipment. We believe that sufficient productive capacity currently exists to fulfill our needs for
paint, coatings and related products through 2019.
Competition
We experience competition from many local, regional, national and international competitors of various sizes in the
manufacture, distribution and sale of our paint, coatings and related products. We are a leading manufacturer and retailer of paint,
coatings and related products to professional, industrial, commercial and retail customers, however, our competitive position varies
for our different products and markets.
In The Americas Group, competitors include other paint and wallpaper stores, mass merchandisers, home centers,
independent hardware stores, hardware chains and manufacturer-operated direct outlets. Product quality, product innovation,
breadth of product line, technical expertise, service and price determine the competitive advantage for this segment.
3
In the Consumer Brands Group, domestic and foreign competitors include manufacturers and distributors of branded and
private-label paint and coatings products. Technology, product quality, product innovation, breadth of product line, technical
expertise, distribution, service and price are the key competitive factors for this segment.
The Performance Coatings Group has numerous competitors in its domestic and foreign markets with broad product offerings
and several others with niche products. Key competitive factors for this segment include technology, product quality, product
innovation, breadth of product line, technical expertise, distribution, service and price.
The Administrative segment has many competitors consisting of other real estate owners, developers and managers in areas
in which this segment owns property. The main competitive factors are the availability of property and price.
Employees
We employed 53,368 persons at December 31, 2018.
Environmental Compliance
For additional information regarding environmental-related matters, see page 28 of our 2018 Annual Report under the caption
“Environmental-Related Liabilities” of “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”
and Notes 1, 9 and 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on pages 47, 62 through 63 and 70, respectively, of our
2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
Certain statements contained in “Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,”
“Letter to Shareholders” and elsewhere in this report constitute “forward-looking statements” within the meaning of the federal
securities laws. These forward-looking statements are based upon management's current expectations, estimates, assumptions and
beliefs concerning future events and conditions and may discuss, among other things, anticipated future performance (including
sales and earnings), expected growth, future business plans and the costs and potential liability for environmental-related matters
and the lead pigment and lead-based paint litigation. Any statement that is not historical in nature is a forward-looking statement
and may be identified by the use of words and phrases such as "believe," "expect," "may," "will," "should," "project," "could,"
"plan," "goal," "potential," "seek," "intend" or "anticipate" or the negative thereof or comparable terminology.
Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on any forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are
necessarily subject to risks, uncertainties and other factors, many of which are outside our control, that could cause actual results to
differ materially from such statements and from our historical results and experience. These risks, uncertainties and other factors
include such things as:
•general business conditions, strengths of retail and manufacturing economies and growth in the coatings industry;
•changes in general domestic economic conditions such as inflation rates, interest rates, tax rates, unemployment rates,
higher labor and healthcare costs, recessions, and changing government policies, laws and regulations;
•changes in raw material and energy supplies and pricing;
•changes in our relationships with customers and suppliers;
•our ability to successfully integrate past and future acquisitions into our existing operations, including Valspar, as well as
the performance of the businesses acquired;
•risks inherent in the achievement of additional anticipated cost synergies resulting from the acquisition of Valspar and the
timing thereof;
•competitive factors, including pricing pressures and product innovation and quality;
•our ability to attain cost savings from productivity initiatives;
•risks and uncertainties associated with our expansion into and our operations in Asia, Europe, South America and other
foreign markets, including general economic conditions, inflation rates, recessions, foreign currency exchange rates,
foreign investment and repatriation restrictions, legal and regulatory constraints, civil unrest and other external economic
and political factors;
•the achievement of growth in foreign markets, such as Asia, Europe and South America;
•increasingly stringent domestic and foreign governmental regulations, including those affecting health, safety and the
environment;
•inherent uncertainties involved in assessing our potential liability for environmental-related activities;
•other changes in governmental policies, laws and regulations, including changes in tariff policies, as well as changes in
accounting policies and standards and taxation requirements (such as new tax laws and new or revised tax law
interpretations);
4
•the nature, cost, quantity and outcome of pending and future litigation and other claims, including the lead pigment and
lead-based paint litigation, and the effect of any legislation and administrative regulations relating thereto; and
•adverse weather conditions and natural disasters.
Readers are cautioned that it is not possible to predict or identify all of the risks, uncertainties and other factors that may
affect future results and that the above list should not be considered to be a complete list. Any forward-looking statement speaks
only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking
statement, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise except as otherwise required by law.
ITEM 1A.    RISK FACTORS
The risks described below and in other documents we file from time to time with the Securities and Exchange Commission
could materially and adversely affect our business, results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
Adverse changes in general business and economic conditions in the United States and worldwide may adversely affect our
results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
Our business is sensitive to global and regional business and economic conditions. Adverse changes in such conditions in the
United States and worldwide may reduce the demand for some of our products and impair the ability of those with whom we do
business to satisfy their obligations to us, each of which could adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or
financial condition. Higher inflation rates, interest rates, tax rates and unemployment rates, higher labor and healthcare costs,
recessions, changing governmental policies, laws and regulations, and other economic factors could also adversely affect demand
for some of our products and our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition and that of our customers, vendors
and suppliers.
A weakening or reversal of the general economic recovery in the United States and other countries and regions in which we do
business, or the continuation or worsening of economic downturns in other countries and regions, may adversely affect our
results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
Global economic uncertainty continues to exist. A weakening or reversal of the general economic recovery in the United
States and other countries and regions in which we do business, or the continuation or worsening of economic downturns in other
countries and regions, may adversely impact our net sales, the collection of accounts receivable, funding for working capital needs,
expected cash flow generation from current and acquired businesses, and our investments, which may adversely impact our results
of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
We finance a portion of our sales through trade credit. Credit markets remain tight, and some customers who require
financing for their businesses have not been able to obtain necessary financing. A continuation or worsening of these conditions
could limit our ability to collect our accounts receivable, which could adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity
or financial condition.
We generally fund a portion of our seasonal working capital needs and obtain funding for other general corporate purposes
through short-term borrowings backed by our revolving credit facility and other financing facilities. If any of the banks in these
credit and financing facilities are unable to perform on their commitments, such inability could adversely impact our cash flow,
liquidity or financial condition, including our ability to obtain funding for working capital needs and other general corporate
purposes.
Although we currently have available credit facilities to fund our current operating needs, we cannot be certain we will be
able to replace our existing credit facilities or refinance our existing or future debt when necessary. Our cost of borrowing and
ability to access the capital markets are affected not only by market conditions, but also by our debt and credit ratings assigned by
the major credit rating agencies. Downgrades in these ratings will increase our cost of borrowing and could have an adverse effect
on our access to the capital markets, including our access to the commercial paper market. An inability to access the capital markets
could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
We have goodwill and intangible assets recorded on our balance sheet. We periodically evaluate the recoverability of the
carrying value of our goodwill and intangible assets whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate such value may not be
recoverable. An impairment assessment involves judgment as to assumptions regarding future sales and cash flow and the impact of
market conditions on those assumptions. Future events and changing market conditions may impact our assumptions and change
our estimates of future sales and cash flow, resulting in us incurring substantial impairment charges, which would adversely affect
our results of operations or financial condition.
We hold investments in equity and debt securities in some of our defined benefit pension plans. A decrease in the value of
plan assets resulting from a general financial downturn may cause a negative pension plan investment performance, which may
adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
5
Protracted duration of economic downturns in cyclical segments of the economy may depress the demand for some of our
products and adversely affect our sales, earnings, cash flow or financial condition.
Portions of our business involve the sale of paint, coatings and related products to segments of the economy that are cyclical
in nature, particularly segments relating to construction, housing, manufacturing and oil production, refining, storage and
transportation. Our sales to these segments are affected by the levels of discretionary consumer and business spending in these
segments. During economic downturns in these segments, the levels of consumer and business discretionary spending may
decrease, and the recovery of these segments may lag behind the recovery of the overall economy. This decrease in spending will
likely reduce the demand for some of our products and may adversely affect our sales, earnings, cash flow or financial condition.
Throughout 2018, interest rates, including mortgage rates, rose and may continue to rise in 2019. Although interest rates
remain low by historical standards, this increase may adversely affect the demand for new residential homes, existing home
turnover and new non-residential construction. Challenging market conditions are expected to continue for the foreseeable future
and may worsen. A worsening in these segments will reduce the demand for some of our products and may adversely impact sales,
earnings and cash flow.
In the U.S. construction and housing segments, the recent demand for new construction has caused contractors to experience
a shortage of skilled workers, resulting in project backlogs and an adverse effect on the growth rate of demand for our products.
While we expect to see higher demand for our products as project backlogs are reduced in the future, this labor shortage may
adversely impact our sales, earnings, cash flow or financial condition.
Increases in the cost of raw materials and energy may adversely affect our earnings or cash flow.
We purchase raw materials (including titanium dioxide and petrochemical feedstock sources, such as propylene and ethylene)
and energy for use in the manufacturing, distribution and sale of our products. Factors such as political instability, higher tariffs and
adverse weather conditions, including hurricanes, and other natural disasters can disrupt raw material and fuel supplies and increase
our costs. Although raw materials and energy supplies (including oil and natural gas) are generally available from various sources
in sufficient quantities, unexpected shortages and increases in the cost of raw materials and energy, or any deterioration in our
relationships with or the financial viability of our suppliers, may have an adverse effect on our earnings or cash flow in the event
we are unable to offset higher costs in a timely manner by sufficiently decreasing our operating costs or raising the prices of our
products. In recent years, some raw material and energy prices have increased, particularly titanium dioxide and petrochemical
feedstock sources, such as propylene and ethylene, as well as metal and plastic packaging. The cost of raw materials and energy has
in the past experienced, and likely will in the future continue to experience, periods of volatility.
Although we have an extensive customer base, the loss of any of our largest customers could adversely affect our sales, earnings
or cash flow.
We have a large and varied customer base due to our extensive distribution network. During 2018, no individual customer
accounted for sales totaling more than ten percent of our sales. However, we have some customers that, individually, purchase a
large amount of products from us. Although our broad distribution channels help to minimize the impact of the loss of any one
customer, the loss of any of these large customers could have an adverse effect on our sales, earnings or cash flow.
Increased competition may reduce our sales, earnings or cash flow performance.
We face substantial competition from many international, national, regional and local competitors of various sizes in the
manufacture, distribution and sale of our paint, coatings and related products. Some of our competitors are larger than us and have
greater financial resources to compete. Other competitors are smaller and may be able to offer more specialized products.
Technology, product quality, product innovation, breadth of product line, technical expertise, distribution, service and price are the
key competitive factors for our business. Competition in any of these areas may reduce our sales and adversely affect our earnings
or cash flow by resulting in decreased sales volumes, reduced prices and increased costs of manufacturing, distributing and selling
our products.
We may not realize the growth opportunities and cost synergies that are anticipated from the acquisition of Valspar.
The benefits that are expected to result from the acquisition of Valspar will depend, in part, on our ability to realize the
anticipated growth opportunities and additional cost synergies as a result of the acquisition. Our success in realizing these growth
opportunities and additional cost synergies, and the timing of this realization, depends on the successful integration of Valspar.
There is a significant degree of difficulty and management distraction inherent in the process of integrating an acquisition as sizable
as Valspar. The process of integrating operations could cause an interruption of, or loss of momentum in, our activities. Members of
our senior management may be required to devote considerable amounts of time to this integration process, which will decrease the
time available to manage our company, service existing customers, attract new customers, and
6
develop new products or strategies. If senior management is not able to effectively manage the integration process, or if any
significant business activities are interrupted as a result of the integration process, our business could suffer. There can be no
assurance we will successfully or cost-effectively integrate Valspar. The failure to do so could have a material adverse effect on our
business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Even if we are able to integrate Valspar successfully, this integration may not result in the realization of the full benefits of the
growth opportunities and additional cost synergies we currently expect from this integration. We also cannot guarantee these
benefits will be achieved within anticipated time frames or at all. For example, we may not be able to eliminate all duplicative
costs, and we may incur substantial, unanticipated expenses in connection with the Valspar integration. While we expect certain
expenses will be incurred to achieve cost synergies, such expenses are difficult to estimate accurately, and may exceed current
estimates. Accordingly, the benefits from the acquisition may be offset by costs incurred to, or delays in, integrating the businesses.
We require a significant amount of cash to service the substantial amount of debt we have outstanding. Our ability to generate
cash depends on many factors beyond our control. We also depend on the business of our subsidiaries to satisfy our cash needs.
If we cannot generate the required cash, we may not be able to make the necessary payments required under our indebtedness.
At December 31, 2018, we had total debt of approximately $9.3 billion, which is a decrease of $1.2 billion since
December 31, 2017 and includes indebtedness incurred to complete the Valspar acquisition. We have the ability under our existing
credit facilities to incur substantial additional indebtedness in the future. Our ability to make payments on our debt, fund our other
liquidity needs, and make planned capital expenditures will depend on our ability to generate cash in the future. Our historical
financial results have been, and we anticipate our future financial results will be, subject to fluctuations. Our ability to generate
cash, to a certain extent, is subject to general economic, financial, competitive, legislative, regulatory and other factors beyond our
control. We cannot guarantee our business will generate sufficient cash flow from our operations or future borrowings will be
available to us in an amount sufficient to enable us to make payments of our debt, fund other liquidity needs and make planned
capital expenditures.
The degree to which we are currently leveraged could have important consequences for shareholders. For example, it could:
•require us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flow from operations to the payment of debt service, reducing
the availability of our cash flow to fund working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and other general corporate
purposes;
•increase our vulnerability to adverse economic or industry conditions;
•limit our ability to obtain additional financing in the future to enable us to react to changes in our business; or
•place us at a competitive disadvantage compared to businesses in our industry that have less debt.
Additionally, any failure to comply with covenants in the instruments governing our debt could result in an event of
default which, if not cured or waived, would have a material adverse effect on us.
A significant portion of our operations are conducted through our subsidiaries. As a result, our ability to generate sufficient
cash flow for our needs is dependent to some extent on the earnings of our subsidiaries and the payment of those earnings to us in
the form of dividends, loans or advances and through repayment of loans or advances from us. Our subsidiaries are separate and
distinct legal entities. Our subsidiaries have no obligation to pay any amounts due on our debt or to provide us with funds to meet
our cash flow needs, whether in the form of dividends, distributions, loans or other payments. In addition, any payment of
dividends, loans or advances by our subsidiaries could be subject to statutory or contractual restrictions. Payments to us by our
subsidiaries will also be contingent upon our subsidiaries’ earnings and business considerations. Our right to receive any assets of
any of our subsidiaries upon their liquidation or reorganization will be effectively subordinated to the claims of that subsidiary’s
creditors, including trade creditors. In addition, even if we are a creditor of any of our subsidiaries, our rights as a creditor would be
subordinate to any security interest in the assets of our subsidiaries and any indebtedness of our subsidiaries senior to that held by
us. Finally, changes in the laws of foreign jurisdictions in which we operate may adversely affect the ability of some of our foreign
subsidiaries to repatriate funds to us.
Our results of operations, cash flow or financial condition may be negatively impacted if we do not successfully integrate future
acquisitions into our existing operations and if the performance of the businesses we acquire do not meet our expectations.
We have historically made strategic acquisitions of businesses in the paint and coatings industry and will likely acquire
additional businesses in the future as part of our long-term growth strategy. The success of future acquisitions depends in large part
on our ability to integrate the operations and personnel of the acquired companies and manage challenges that may arise as
7
a result of the acquisitions, particularly when the acquired businesses operate in new or foreign markets. In the event we do not
successfully integrate such future acquisitions into our existing operations so as to realize the expected return on our investment,
our results of operations, cash flow or financial condition could be adversely affected.
Risks and uncertainties associated with our expansion into and our operations in Asia, Europe, South America and other
foreign markets could adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
Net external sales of our consolidated foreign subsidiaries totaled approximately 23.0%, 19.8% and 14.5% of our total
consolidated net sales in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively. Sales outside of the United States make up a significant part of our
current business and future strategic plans. Our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition could be adversely
affected by a variety of domestic and international factors, including general economic conditions, political instability, inflation
rates, recessions, tariffs, foreign currency exchange rates, foreign currency exchange controls, interest rates, foreign investment and
repatriation restrictions, legal and regulatory constraints, civil unrest, difficulties in staffing and managing foreign operations and
other external economic and political factors. Our inability to successfully manage the risks and uncertainties relating to these
factors could adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
In many foreign countries, it is acceptable to engage in certain business practices we are prohibited from engaging in because
of regulations applicable to us, such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the UK Bribery Act. Recent years have seen a
substantial increase in anti-bribery law enforcement activity, with more frequent and aggressive investigations and enforcement
proceedings by both U.S. and non-U.S. regulators, and an increase in criminal and civil proceedings brought against companies and
individuals. Although we have internal control policies and procedures designed to ensure compliance with these regulations, there
can be no assurance our policies and procedures will prevent a violation of these regulations. Any violation could cause an adverse
effect on our results of operations, cash flow or financial condition.
Policy changes affecting international trade could adversely impact the demand for our products and our competitive position.
Due to the international scope of our operations, changes in government policies on foreign trade and investment may affect
the demand for our products and services, impact the competitive position of our products or prevent us from being able to sell
products in certain countries. Our business benefits from free trade agreements, such as the North American Free Trade Agreement
and successor agreements, which may include the United States-Mexico-Canada Agreement, and efforts to withdraw from, or
substantially modify such agreements, in addition to the implementation of more restrictive trade policies, such as more detailed
inspections, higher tariffs, import or export licensing requirements, exchange controls or new barriers to entry, could have a
material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition or cash flow and that of our customers, vendors and
suppliers.
Additionally, the results of the United Kingdom’s referendum on European Union membership, advising for the exit from the
European Union, has caused and may continue to cause significant volatility in global stock markets, currency exchange rate
fluctuations and global economic uncertainty. Although it is unknown what the terms of the United Kingdom’s future relationship
with the European Union will be, it is possible there will be greater restrictions on imports and exports between the United
Kingdom and the European Union and increased regulatory complexities. Any of these factors could adversely impact customer
demand, our relationships with customers and suppliers and our results of operations.
Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates could adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity or
financial condition.
Because of our international operations, we are exposed to risk associated with interest rates and value changes in foreign
currencies, which may adversely affect our business. Historically, our reported net sales, earnings, cash flow and financial condition
have been subjected to fluctuations in foreign exchange rates. Our primary exchange rate exposure is with the Euro, the Chinese
yuan, the Brazilian real, the Canadian dollar, the British pound, the Mexican peso and the Australian dollar, each against the
U.S. dollar. While we actively manage the exposure of our foreign currency risk as part of our overall financial risk management
policy, we believe we may experience losses from foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations, and such losses could adversely
affect our sales, earnings, cash flow, liquidity or financial condition.
We are subject to a wide variety of complex domestic and foreign laws, rules and regulations, for which compliance could
adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow or financial condition.
We are subject to a wide variety of complex domestic and foreign laws, rules and regulations, and legal compliance risks,
including securities laws, tax laws, employment and pension-related laws, competition laws, U.S. and foreign export and trading
laws, data privacy and security laws, and laws governing improper business practices. We are affected by new laws and
8
regulations, and changes to existing laws and regulations, including interpretations by courts and regulators. From time to time, our
Company, our operations and the industries in which we operate are being reviewed or investigated by regulators, which could lead
to enforcement actions or the assertion of private litigation claims and damages.
Although we believe we have adopted appropriate risk management and compliance programs to mitigate these risks, the
global and diverse nature of our operations means compliance risks will continue to exist. Investigations, examinations and other
proceedings, the nature and outcome of which cannot be predicted, will likely arise from time to time. These investigations,
examinations and other proceedings could subject us to significant liability and require us to take significant accruals or pay
significant settlements, fines and penalties, which could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, cash flow or
financial condition.
We are subject to tax laws and regulations in the United States and multiple foreign jurisdictions. We are affected by changes
in tax laws and regulations, as well as changes in related interpretations and other tax guidance. In the ordinary course of our
business, we are subject to examinations and investigations by various tax authorities and other regulators. In addition to existing
examinations and investigations, there could be additional examinations and investigations in the future, and existing examinations
and investigations could be expanded.
On December 22, 2017, U.S. tax reform legislation known as the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “Tax Act”) was signed into law.
The Tax Act made substantial changes to then-current U.S. tax law, including a reduction in the corporate tax rate, a limitation on
deductibility of interest expense, a limitation on the use of net operating losses to offset future taxable income, the allowance of
immediate expensing of capital expenditures, deemed repatriation of foreign earnings and significant changes to the taxation of
foreign earnings going forward. The Tax Act contains numerous, complex provisions impacting U.S. multinational companies, and
we continue to review and assess the legislative language and guidance promulgated by regulators to determine the Tax Act's full
impact on us. The full extent of the impact remains uncertain at this time, and our current interpretations of, and assumptions
regarding, the Tax Act are subject to additional regulatory or administrative developments, including any regulations or additional
guidance promulgated by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service or other regulators. Further, we can provide no assurance our current
interpretations of, and assumptions regarding, the Tax Act and any related regulations or guidance will not be reviewed or
investigated by regulators in the future. As a result, the Tax Act, including any regulations or other guidance promulgated by the
U.S. Internal Revenue Service or other regulators, and other tax laws could have significant effects on us, some of which could
materially and adversely impact our financial condition, results of operations and cash flow.
For non-income tax risks, we estimate material loss contingencies and accrue for such loss contingencies as required by
U.S. generally accepted accounting principles based on our assessment of contingencies where liability is deemed probable and
reasonably estimable in light of the facts and circumstances known to us at a particular point in time. Subsequent developments
may affect our assessment and estimates of the loss contingency. In the event the loss contingency is ultimately determined to be
significantly higher than currently accrued, the recording of the additional liability may result in a material adverse effect on our
results of operations or financial condition for the annual or interim period during which such additional liability is accrued. In
those cases where no accrual is recorded because it is not probable a liability has been incurred and cannot be reasonably estimated,
any potential liability ultimately determined to be attributable to us may result in a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, cash flow or financial condition for the annual or interim period during which such liability is accrued or paid. For
income tax risks, we recognize tax benefits based on our assessment that a tax benefit has a greater than 50% likelihood of being
sustained upon ultimate settlement with the applicable taxing authority that has full knowledge of all relevant facts. For those
income tax positions where we determine there is not a greater than 50% likelihood such tax benefits will be sustained, we do not
recognize a tax benefit in our financial statements. Subsequent events may cause us to change our assessment of the likelihood of
sustaining a previously-recognized benefit which could result in a material adverse effect on our results of operations, cash flow or
financial position for the annual or interim period during which such liability is accrued or paid.
We discuss risks and uncertainties with regard to taxes in more detail in Note 15 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements on pages 71 through 73 of our 2018 Annual Report.
Adverse weather conditions and natural disasters may temporarily reduce the demand for some of our products and could have
a negative effect on our sales, earnings or cash flow.
Our business is seasonal in nature, with the second and third quarters typically generating a higher proportion of sales and
earnings than other quarters. From time to time, adverse weather conditions and natural disasters have had an adverse effect on our
sales of paint, coatings and related products. For example, during 2018 the impact of Hurricanes Michael and Florence, on our
operations in Florida, the Carolinas and neighboring areas, as well as the wildfires in California, resulted in a temporary shutdown
of some of our company-operated paint stores, manufacturing facilities and/or distribution centers in the affected regions, resulting
in reduced revenues. In addition, unusually cold and rainy weather could have an adverse effect on sales of our exterior paint
products. An adverse effect on sales may cause a reduction in our earnings or cash flow.
9
Inability to protect or enforce our material trademarks and other intellectual property rights could have an adverse effect on our
business.
We have numerous patents, trade secrets, trademarks, trade names and know-how that are valuable to our business. Despite
our efforts to protect such intellectual property and other proprietary information from unauthorized use or disclosure, third parties
may attempt to disclose, obtain or use our trademarks or such other intellectual property and information without our authorization.
Although we rely on the patent, trademark, trade secret and copyright laws of the United States and other countries to protect our
intellectual property rights, the laws of some countries may not protect such rights to the same extent as the laws of the United
States. Unauthorized use of our intellectual property by third parties, the failure of foreign countries to have laws to protect our
intellectual property rights, or an inability to effectively enforce such rights in foreign countries could have an adverse effect on our
business.
Security breaches and other disruptions to our information technology infrastructure could interfere with our operations,
compromise our information and the information of our customers and suppliers and severely harm our business.
As part of our business, we collect, process, and retain sensitive and confidential personal information about our customers,
employees and suppliers. Despite the security measures we have in place, our facilities and systems, and those of the retailers,
dealers, licensees and other third-party suppliers and vendors with which we do business, may be vulnerable to security breaches,
cyber attacks, acts of vandalism or misconduct, computer viruses, misplaced or lost data, programming and/or human errors or
other similar events. Any security breach involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized disclosure of confidential
customer, employee, supplier or Company information, whether caused by us, an unknown third party, or the retailers, dealers,
licensees or other third-party suppliers and vendors with which we do business, could result in losses, severely damage our
reputation, expose us to the risks of litigation and liability, disrupt our operations and have a material adverse effect on our
business, results of operations and financial condition. As cyber security threats evolve in sophistication and become more
prevalent in numerous industries worldwide, we continue to increase our sensitivity and attention to these threats, seek additional
investments and resources to address these threats and enhance the security of our facilities and systems and strengthen our controls
and procedures implemented to monitor and mitigate these threats. The domestic and international regulatory environment related
to information security, data collection and privacy is increasingly rigorous and complex, with new and constantly changing
requirements applicable to our business. Compliance with these requirements, including the European Union's General Data
Protection Regulation and other domestic and international regulations, could result in additional costs and changes to our business
practices.
Moreover, we rely heavily on computer systems to manage and operate our business, record and process transactions, and
manage, support and communicate with our employees, customers, suppliers and other vendors. Computer systems are important to
production planning, finance, company operations and customer service, among other business-critical processes. Despite efforts to
prevent disruptions to our computer systems, our systems may be affected by damage or interruption from, among other causes,
power outages, system failures, computer viruses and other intrusions, including cyber attacks. Computer hardware and storage
equipment that is integral to efficient operations, such as email, telephone and other functionality, is concentrated in certain
physical locations in the various continents in which we operate. Additionally, we rely on software applications, enterprise cloud
storage systems and cloud computing services provided by third-party vendors, and our business may be adversely affected by
service disruptions in or security breaches to such third-party systems.
We are required to comply with numerous complex and increasingly stringent domestic and foreign health, safety and
environmental laws and regulations, the cost of which is likely to increase and may adversely affect our results of operations,
cash flow or financial condition.
Our operations are subject to various domestic and foreign health, safety and environmental laws and regulations. These laws
and regulations not only govern our current operations and products, but also impose potential liability on us for our past
operations. We expect health, safety and environmental laws and regulations to impose increasingly stringent requirements upon
our industry and us in the future. Our costs to comply with these laws and regulations may increase as these requirements become
more stringent in the future, and these increased costs may adversely affect our results of operations, cash flow or financial
condition.
We are involved with environmental investigation and remediation activities at some of our currently and formerly owned sites,
as well as a number of third-party sites, for which our ultimate liability may exceed the current amount we have accrued.
We are involved with environmental investigation and remediation activities at some of our currently and formerly owned
sites and a number of third-party sites. We accrue for estimated costs of investigation and remediation activities at these sites for
which commitments or clean-up plans have been developed and when such costs can be reasonably estimated based on industry
standards and professional judgment. These estimated costs are based on currently available facts regarding each site.
10
We continuously assess our potential liability for investigation and remediation activities and adjust our environmental-related
accruals as information becomes available upon which more accurate costs can be reasonably estimated. Due to the uncertainties
surrounding environmental investigation and remediation activities, our liability may result in costs that are significantly higher
than currently accrued and may have an adverse effect on our earnings. We discuss these risks and uncertainties in more detail on
page 23 of our 2018 Annual Report under the caption “Environmental Matters,” page 28 of our 2018 Annual Report under the
caption “Environmental-Related Liabilities” and in Note 9 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on pages 62 through
63 of our 2018 Annual Report.
The nature, cost, quantity and outcome of pending and future litigation, such as litigation arising from the historical
manufacture and sale of lead pigments and lead-based paint, could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations,
cash flow, liquidity and financial condition.
In the course of our business, we are subject to a variety of claims and lawsuits, including, but not limited to, litigation
relating to product liability and warranty, personal injury, environmental, intellectual property, commercial, contractual and antitrust
claims that are inherently subject to many uncertainties regarding the possibility of a loss to us. These uncertainties will ultimately
be resolved when one or more future events occur or fail to occur confirming the incurrence of a liability or the reduction of a
liability. In accordance with the Contingencies Topic of the ASC, we accrue for these contingencies by a charge to income when it
is both probable that one or more future events will occur confirming the fact of a loss and the amount of the loss can be reasonably
estimated. In the event a loss contingency is ultimately determined to be significantly higher than currently accrued, the recording
of the additional liability may result in a material impact on our results of operations, liquidity or financial condition for the annual
or interim period during which such additional liability is accrued. In those cases where no accrual is recorded because it is not
probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount of any such loss cannot be reasonably estimated, any potential liability
ultimately determined to be attributable to us may result in a material impact on our results of operations, liquidity or financial
condition for the annual or interim period during which such liability is accrued.
Our past operations included the manufacture and sale of lead pigments and lead-based paints. Along with other companies,
we are and have been a defendant in a number of legal proceedings, including individual personal injury actions, purported class
actions and actions brought by various counties, cities, school districts and other government-related entities, arising from the
manufacture and sale of lead pigments and lead-based paints. The plaintiffs' claims have been based upon various legal theories,
including negligence, strict liability, breach of warranty, negligent misrepresentations and omissions, fraudulent misrepresentations
and omissions, concert of action, civil conspiracy, violations of unfair trade practice and consumer protection laws, enterprise
liability, market share liability, public nuisance, unjust enrichment and other theories. The plaintiffs seek various damages and
relief, including personal injury and property damage, costs relating to the detection and abatement of lead-based paint from
buildings, costs associated with a public education campaign, medical monitoring costs and others. We have also been a defendant
in legal proceedings arising from the manufacture and sale of non-lead-based paints that seek recovery based upon various legal
theories, including the failure to adequately warn of potential exposure to lead during surface preparation when using non-lead-
based paint on surfaces previously painted with lead-based paint. We believe the litigation brought to date is without merit or
subject to meritorious defenses and are vigorously defending such litigation. We have not settled any material lead pigment or lead-
based paint litigation. We expect additional lead pigment and lead-based paint litigation may be filed against us in the future
asserting similar or different legal theories and seeking similar or different types of damages and relief.
Notwithstanding our views on the merits, litigation is inherently subject to many uncertainties, and we ultimately may not
prevail. Adverse court rulings, such as the court's decision in the Santa Clara County, California proceeding, the jury verdict against
us and other defendants in the State of Rhode Island action and the Wisconsin State Supreme Court’s determination that
Wisconsin’s risk contribution theory may apply in the lead pigment litigation, or determinations of liability, among other factors,
could affect the lead pigment and lead-based paint litigation against us and encourage an increase in the number and nature of
future claims and proceedings. In addition, from time to time, various legislation and administrative regulations have been enacted,
promulgated or proposed to impose obligations on present and former manufacturers of lead pigments and lead-based paints
respecting asserted health concerns associated with such products or to overturn the effect of court decisions in which we and other
manufacturers have been successful.
Due to the uncertainties involved, management is unable to predict the outcome of the lead pigment and lead-based paint
litigation, the number or nature of possible future claims and proceedings, or the effect any legislation and/or administrative
regulations may have on the litigation or against us. In addition, management cannot reasonably determine the scope or amount of
the potential costs and liabilities related to such litigation, or resulting from any such legislation and regulations. Except with
respect to the litigation in California, we have not accrued any amounts for such litigation because we do not believe it is probable
that a loss has occurred, and we believe it is not possible to estimate the range of potential losses as there is no substantive
information upon which an estimate could be based. In addition, any potential liability that may result from any changes to
legislation and regulations cannot reasonably be estimated. In the event any significant liability is determined to be attributable to
us relating to such litigation, or any such liability is higher than any amount currently accrued for such litigation,
11
the recording of the liability, or additional liability, as applicable, may result in a material impact on net income for the annual or
interim period during which such liability is accrued. Additionally, due to the uncertainties associated with the amount of any such
liability and/or the nature of any other remedy which may be imposed in such litigation, any potential liability determined to be
attributable to us arising out of such litigation may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, cash flow, liquidity
or financial condition.
We discuss the risks and uncertainties related to litigation, including the lead pigment and lead-based paint litigation, in more
detail in Note 10 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on pages 63 through 67 of our 2018 Annual Report.
ITEM 1B.    UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
12
ITEM 2.    PROPERTIES
We own our world headquarters located in Cleveland, Ohio, which includes the world headquarters for The Americas Group,
Consumer Brands Group and Performance Coatings Group. Our principal manufacturing and distribution facilities are located as
set forth below. We believe our manufacturing and distribution facilities are well-maintained and are suitable and adequate, and
have sufficient productive capacity, to meet our current needs.
  
Manufacturing  Distribution
Leased Owned Total  Leased Owned Total
Consumer Brands Group  
Asia 1 6 7  1 3 4
Australia and New Zealand 4 4  1 5 6
Canada 3 3  1 1
Europe 1 3 4  2 3 5
Jamaica 1 1  1 1
Latin America 3 6 9  4 5 9
United States 5 27 32  8 3 11
Total 10 50 60  17 20 37
 
Performance Coatings Group  
Africa 1 1  1 1
Asia 2 5 7  2 4 6
Canada 1 1  
Europe 4 19 23  5 13 18
Latin America 5 5  1 7 8
United States 1 12 13  1 12 13
Total 7 43 50  9 37 46
 
The operations of The Americas Group included one manufacturing and distribution facility in Uruguay and 4,696 company-
operated specialty paint stores, of which 217 were owned, in the United States, Canada, Puerto Rico, Virgin Islands, Grenada,
Trinidad and Tobago, St. Maarten, Jamaica, Curacao, Aruba, St. Lucia, Uruguay, Brazil, Chile, Peru, Mexico, Ecuador and
Barbados at December 31, 2018. These paint stores are divided into six separate operating divisions that are responsible for the sale
of predominantly architectural, protective and marine and related products through the paint stores located within their
geographical region. At the end of 2018:
•the Mid Western Division operated 1,105 paint stores primarily located in the midwestern and upper west coast states;
•the Eastern Division operated 868 paint stores along the upper east coast and New England states;
•the Canada Division operated 241 paint stores throughout Canada;
•the Southeastern Division operated 1,117 paint stores principally covering the lower east and gulf coast states, Puerto Rico,
Virgin Islands, Grenada, Trinidad and Tobago, St. Maarten, Jamaica, Curacao, Aruba, St. Lucia and Barbados;
•the South Western Division operated 1,023 paint stores in the central plains and the lower west coast states; and
•the Latin America Division operated 342 paint stores in Uruguay, Brazil, Chile, Peru, Mexico and Ecuador.
During 2018, The Americas Group opened 76 net new stores, consisting of 91 new stores opened (74 in the United States, 16
in Canada, and 1 in South America) and 15 stores closed (1 in the United States, 2 in Canada, 11 in South America and 1 in
Mexico).
The Performance Coatings Group operated 223 branches in the United States, of which 8 were owned, at December 31, 2018.
The Performance Coatings Group also operated 59 branches internationally, of which 6 were owned, at December 31,
13
2018, consisting of branches in Canada (21), Europe (16), Chile (11), Mexico (4), Peru (4) and Vietnam (3). During 2018, this
segment opened 3 new branches and closed 11 branches for a net decrease of (8) branches.
All real property within the Administrative segment is owned by us. For additional information regarding real property within
the Administrative segment, see the information set forth in Item 1 of this report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
For additional information regarding real property leases, see Note 18 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on
page 74 of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
ITEM 3.    LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
On September 14, 2018, the California Air Resources Board (“CARB”) issued a Notice of Violation to the Company for
several aerosol coatings products that were allegedly labeled incorrectly or otherwise violated CARB rules. The Company entered
into settlement negotiations with CARB in an attempt to resolve the alleged violations. On January 15, 2019, a settlement
conference was held, and an agreement to resolve the alleged violations was reached pursuant to which the Company has agreed to
pay a penalty of $220,000 to resolve the matter.
As previously disclosed in the Company’s Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2018, the Company
received a letter dated September 26, 2018 from the South Coast Air Quality Management District (“SCAQMD”) in California
alleging excess emissions from non-compliant coatings and seeking a proposed penalty of approximately $1.5 million. Settlement
discussions regarding this matter have been unsuccessful to date, and SCAQMD filed a civil Complaint against the Company on
November 30, 2018 in the Superior Court of California seeking civil penalties, costs and injunctive relief including an initial
demand of $30 million. The Company disputes the allegations in the Complaint and intends to vigorously defend this matter.
For information regarding environmental-related matters and other legal proceedings, see pages 28 and 30 of our 2018
Annual Report under the captions “Environmental-Related Liabilities” and “Litigation” of “Management’s Discussion and Analysis
of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” and Notes 1, 9, 10 and 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on
pages 47, 62 through 63, 63 through 67 and 70, respectively, of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
ITEM 4.    MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT
The following is the name, age and present position of each of our executive officers and all persons chosen to become
executive officers, as well as all prior positions held by each during the last five years. Executive officers are generally elected
annually by the Board of Directors and hold office until their successors are elected and qualified or until their earlier death,
resignation or removal.
 
Name Age Present Position
John G. Morikis 55 Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, Director
Allen J. Mistysyn 50 Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer
Jane M. Cronin 51 Senior Vice President - Corporate Controller
Mary L. Garceau 46 Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
Thomas P. Gilligan 58 Senior Vice President - Human Resources
Robert J. Wells 61 Senior Vice President - Corporate Communications and Public Affairs
Joel D. Baxter 58 President & General Manager, Global Supply Chain Division, Consumer
Brands Group
Aaron M. Erter 45 President, Consumer Brands Group
Peter J. Ippolito 54 President, The Americas Group
David B. Sewell 50 President, Performance Coatings Group
Robert F. Lynch 58 President & General Manager, Retail - North America,
Consumer Brands Group
14
Mr. Morikis has served as Chairman since January 2017 and President and Chief Executive Officer since January 2016. Mr.
Morikis served as President and Chief Operating Officer from October 2006 to January 2016. Mr. Morikis has served as a Director
since October 2015 and has been employed with the Company since December 1984. Effective March 1, 2019, Mr. Morikis will
serve as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer.
Mr. Mistysyn has served as Senior Vice President - Finance and Chief Financial Officer since January 2017. Mr. Mistysyn
served as Senior Vice President - Finance from October 2016 to January 2017, Senior Vice President - Corporate Controller from
October 2014 to October 2016, and Vice President - Corporate Controller from May 2010 to October 2014. Mr. Mistysyn has been
employed with the Company since June 1990.
Ms. Cronin has served as Senior Vice President - Corporate Controller since October 2016. Ms. Cronin served as Vice
President - Corporate Audit and Loss Prevention from September 2013 to October 2016. Ms. Cronin has been employed with the
Company since September 1989.
Ms. Garceau has served as Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary since August 2017. Ms. Garceau served as
Vice President, Deputy General Counsel and Assistant Secretary from June 2017 to August 2017, Associate General Counsel and
Assistant Secretary from April 2017 to June 2017, and Associate General Counsel from February 2014 to April 2017. Prior to
joining the Company, Ms. Garceau was General Counsel of Thirty-One Gifts LLC from August 2011 to February 2014. Ms.
Garceau has been employed with the Company since February 2014.
Mr. Gilligan has served as Senior Vice President - Human Resources since January 2016. Mr. Gilligan served as Senior Vice
President, Human Resources, The Americas Group from August 2014 to January 2016 and Senior Vice President, Human
Resources, Paint Stores Group from July 2000 to August 2014. Mr. Gilligan has been employed with the Company since October
1983.
Mr. Wells has served as Senior Vice President - Corporate Communications and Public Affairs since February 2009. Mr.
Wells has been employed with the Company since May 1998.
Mr. Baxter has served as President & General Manager, Global Supply Chain Division, Consumer Brands Group (f/k/a
Consumer Group) since September 2008. Mr. Baxter has been employed with the Company since September 1990.
Mr. Erter has served as President, Consumer Brands Group since August 2017. Mr. Erter served as President & General
Manager, Consumer Division, Consumer Brands Group from June 2017 to August 2017. Prior to joining the Company in
connection with the acquisition of The Valspar Corporation, Mr. Erter served as Senior Vice President of Valspar from December
2015 to June 2017 and Vice President and General Manager, North America of Valspar from November 2011 to December 2015.
Mr. Erter has been employed with the Company since June 2017. Mr. Erter was named President, Performance Coatings Group
effective March 1, 2019.
Mr. Ippolito has served as President, The Americas Group since January 2018. Mr. Ippolito served as President & General
Manager, Mid Western Division, The Americas Group from November 2010 to January 2018. Mr. Ippolito has been employed
with the Company since May 1986.
Mr. Sewell has served as President, Performance Coatings Group (f/k/a Global Finishes Group) since August 2014. Mr.
Sewell served as President & General Manager, Product Finishes Division, Global Finishes Group from July 2012 to August 2014.
Mr. Sewell has been employed with the Company since February 2007. Mr. Sewell was named President and Chief Operating
Officer of the Company effective March 1, 2019.
Mr. Lynch has served as President & General Manager, Retail - North America, Consumer Brands Group since August 2017.
Mr. Lynch served as Senior Vice President, Sales, Automotive Finishes Division, Global Finishes Group from August 2012 to July
2017. Mr. Lynch has been employed with the Company since October 2000. Mr. Lynch was named President, Consumer Brands
Group effective March 1, 2019 and will become an executive officer at that time.
15
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange and traded under the symbol SHW. The number of
shareholders of record at January 31, 2019 was 6,219.
The performance graph set forth on page 16 of our 2018 Annual Report is incorporated herein by reference. The
information with respect to securities authorized for issuance under the Company’s equity compensation plans is set forth under the
caption “Equity Compensation Plan Information” in our Proxy Statement, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table sets forth a summary of the Company’s purchases of common stock during the fourth quarter of 2018. 
Period  Total
Number of
Shares
PurchasedAverage Price
Paid per
Share  Total Number
of Shares
Purchased as
Part of a
Publicly
Announced Plan Maximum Number
of Shares
that May
Yet Be
Purchased Under
the Plan
       
October 1 – October 31       
Share repurchase program (1) 600,000 $ 408.30 600,000 10,125,000
Employee transactions (2) 181 $ 417.12   N/A
       
November 1 – November 30       
Employee transactions (2) 38 $ 389.54   N/A
       
December 1 – December 31       
Employee transactions (2) 130 $ 389.51   N/A
Total       
Share repurchase program (1) 600,000 $ 408.30 600,000 10,125,000
Employee transactions (2) 349 $ 403.83   N/A
       
(1) All shares are purchased through the Company’s publicly announced share repurchase program. There is no expiration date
specified for the program. The Company had remaining authorization at December 31, 2018 to purchase 10,125,000 shares.
(2) All shares were delivered to satisfy the exercise price and/or tax withholding obligations by employees who exercised stock
options or had shares of restricted stock vest.
16
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
(millions of dollars, except per common share data)
 
 2018 2017  2016 2015 2014  
Operations     
Net sales $17,534 $14,984 $11,856 $11,339 $11,130 
Net income from continuing operations 1,109 1,769 1,133 1,054 866 
     
Financial Position     
Total assets $19,134 $19,900 $6,753 $5,779 $5,699 
Long-term debt 8,708 9,886 1,211 1,907 1,116 
Ratio of earnings to fixed charges (1)3.6x 4.5x 6.5x 9.1x 7.7x 
     
Per Common Share Data     
Net income from continuing operations —
diluted (2)11.67 18.64 11.99 11.15 8.77 
Cash dividends 3.44 3.40 3.36 2.68 2.20 
(1) For purposes of calculating the ratio of earnings to fixed charges, earnings represent income before income taxes plus fixed
charges. Fixed charges consist of interest expense, net, including amortization of discount and financing costs and the portion
of operating rental expense which management believes is representative of the interest component of rent expense. The
following schedule includes the figures used to calculate the ratios:
 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014
Income before income taxes $1,360 $1,469 $1,595 $1,549 $1,258
Fixed charges:     
Interest expense, net 367 263 154 62 64
Interest component of rent expense 165 153 138 130 125
Total fixed charges 532 416 292 192 189
Earnings $1,892 $1,885 $1,887 $1,741 $1,447
(2) Presented under the treasury stock method.
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
The information required by this item is set forth on pages 19 through 35 of our 2018 Annual Report under the caption
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,” which is incorporated herein by
reference.
ITEM 7A.    QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
We are exposed to market risk associated with interest rates, foreign currency and commodity fluctuations. We occasionally
utilize derivative instruments as part of our overall financial risk management policy, but do not use derivative instruments for
speculative or trading purposes. The Company entered into foreign currency forward currency exchange contracts during 2018 to
hedge against value changes in foreign currency. There were no material contracts outstanding at December 31, 2018. Foreign
currency forward contracts are described in Note 14 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on page 71 of our 2018
Annual Report. We believe we may experience continuing losses from foreign currency fluctuations. However, we do not expect
currency translation, transaction or hedging contract losses to have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of
operations or cash flows. The interest rate lock agreements entered into in 2016 were settled during 2017. See Note 8 of the Notes
to Consolidated Financial Statements on pages 61 through 62 of our 2018 Annual Report.
17
ITEM 8.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Information required by this item is set forth on pages 38 through 77 of our 2018 Annual Report under the captions “Report
of Management on the Consolidated Financial Statements,” “Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the
Consolidated Financial Statements,” “Statements of Consolidated Income and Comprehensive Income,” “Consolidated Balance
Sheets,” “Statements of Consolidated Cash Flows,” “Statements of Consolidated Shareholders’ Equity,” and “Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements,” which is incorporated herein by reference. Unaudited quarterly data is set forth in Note 17 of
the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements on page 74 of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A.    CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
As of the end of the period covered by this report, we carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the
participation of our Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer and our Senior Vice President – Finance and Chief Financial
Officer, of the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures pursuant to Rule 13a-15 and Rule 15d-15 of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (“Exchange Act”). Based upon that evaluation, our Chairman, President and Chief Executive
Officer and our Senior Vice President – Finance and Chief Financial Officer concluded that as of the end of the period covered by
this report our disclosure controls and procedures were effective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in reports
we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in
Securities and Exchange Commission rules and forms, and accumulated and communicated to our management, including our
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer and our Senior Vice President – Finance and Chief Financial Officer, to allow
timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The “Report of Management on Internal Control over Financial Reporting” is set forth on page 36 of our 2018 Annual
Report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
The “Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on Internal Control over Financial Reporting” is set forth
on page 37 of our 2018 Annual Report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
There were no changes in our internal control over financial reporting identified in connection with the evaluation that
occurred during the period covered by this report that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our
internal control over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B.    OTHER INFORMATION
None.
18
PART III
ITEM 10.    DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Directors
The information regarding our directors and director nominees is set forth under the captions “Proposal 1 – Election of
Directors” and “Experiences, Qualifications, Attributes and Skills of Director Nominees” in our Proxy Statement, which is
incorporated herein by reference.
There were no material changes to the procedures by which security holders may recommend nominees to our Board of
Directors during 2018. Please refer to the information set forth under the caption “Board Meetings and Committees” in our Proxy
Statement, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Executive Officers
The information regarding our executive officers is set forth under the caption “Executive Officers of the Registrant” in Part I
of this report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance
The information regarding compliance with Section 16 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 is set forth under the caption
“Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance” in our Proxy Statement, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Audit Committee
The information regarding the Audit Committee of our Board of Directors and the information regarding audit committee
financial experts are set forth under the caption “Board Meetings and Committees” in our Proxy Statement, which is incorporated
herein by reference.
Code of Ethics
We have adopted a Code of Conduct, which applies to all directors, officers and employees of Sherwin-Williams and our
subsidiaries wherever located. Our Code of Conduct contains the general guidelines and principles for conducting Sherwin-
Williams' business consistent with the highest standards of business ethics. Under our Code of Ethics for Senior Financial
Management, our chief executive officer, chief financial officer and senior financial management are responsible for creating and
maintaining a culture of high ethical standards and of commitment to compliance throughout our company to ensure the fair and
timely reporting of Sherwin-Williams' financial results and condition. Senior financial management includes the controller, the
treasurer, the principal financial/accounting personnel in our operating groups and divisions, and all other financial/accounting
personnel within our corporate departments and operating groups and divisions with staff supervision responsibilities. Please refer
to the information set forth under the caption “Corporate Governance – Code of Conduct” in our Proxy Statement, which is
incorporated herein by reference. Our Code of Conduct and Code of Ethics for Senior Financial Management are available in the
“Corporate Governance” section on the “Investor Relations” page of our website at www.sherwin.com.
We intend to disclose on our website at www.sherwin.com any amendment to, or waiver from, a provision of our Code of
Conduct or Code of Ethics for Senior Financial Management that applies to our directors and executive officers, including our
principal executive officer, principal financial officer, principal accounting officer or controller, or any persons performing similar
functions, and that is required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission.
ITEM 11.    EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
The information required by this item is set forth under the captions “Compensation Committee Report,” “Compensation
Risk Assessment,” “2018 Director Compensation Table” and “Director Compensation Program” in our Proxy Statement, and under
the "Executive Compensation" section of our Proxy Statement commencing with the information under the caption “Compensation
Discussion and Analysis (CD&A)” and continuing through the information under the caption “2018 CEO Pay Ratio,” which is
incorporated herein by reference.
19
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
The information regarding security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management is set forth under the captions
“Security Ownership of Management” and “Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners” in our Proxy Statement, which is
incorporated herein by reference.
The information regarding securities authorized for issuance under the Company’s equity compensation plans is set forth
under the caption “Equity Compensation Plan Information” in our Proxy Statement, which is incorporated herein by reference. 
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
The information required by this item is set forth under the captions “Certain Relationships and Transactions with Related
Persons” and “Independence of Directors” in our Proxy Statement, which is incorporated herein by reference.
ITEM 14.    PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
The information required by this item is set forth under the caption “Matters Relating to the Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm” in our Proxy Statement, which is incorporated herein by reference.
20
PART IV
ITEM 15.    EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)(1)Financial Statements
The following consolidated financial statements of the Company included in our 2018 Annual Report are incorporated by
reference in Item 8.
(i) Report of Management on the Consolidated Financial Statements (page 38 of our 2018 Annual Report);
(ii) Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm on the Consolidated Financial Statements (page 39 of
our 2018 Annual Report);
(iii) Statements of Consolidated Income and Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016 (page 40 and 41 of our 2018 Annual Report);
(iv) Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 (page 42 of our 2018 Annual Report);
(v) Statements of Consolidated Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 (page 43 of our
2018 Annual Report);
(vi) Statements of Consolidated Shareholders’ Equity for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 (page 44
of our 2018 Annual Report); and
(vii) Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 (pages 45
through 77 of our 2018 Annual Report).
(2) Financial Statement Schedule
Schedule II — Valuation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016 is set forth below. All other schedules for which provision is made in the applicable accounting regulations of
the Securities and Exchange Commission are not required under the related instructions or are inapplicable and
therefore have been omitted.
Valuation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves
(Schedule II)
Changes in the allowance for doubtful accounts were as follows: 
(thousands of dollars) 2018 2017 2016
Beginning balance $52,997 $40,450 $49,420
Bad debt expense 38,240 42,716 29,869
Uncollectible accounts written off, net of recoveries(45,354) (30,169) (38,839)
Ending balance $45,883 $52,997 $40,450
Changes in deferred tax asset valuation allowances were as follows:
(thousands of dollars) 2018 2017 2016
Beginning balance $44,101 $17,292 $12,595
Additions (deductions) (1)10,660 (489) 4,697
Acquired balances 18,782 27,298 —
Ending balance $73,543 $44,101 $17,292
(1) Additions (deductions) did not have a material impact on the Income Statement in 2018, 2017 or 2016.
21
(3) Exhibits
2. *(a)Agreement and Plan of Merger, among the Company, Viking Merger Sub, Inc., and The Valspar
Corporation, dated as of March 19, 2016, filed as Exhibit 2.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form
8-K dated March 19, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
3. (a)Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended through February 18,
2015, filed as Exhibit 3 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K dated February 18, 2015, and
incorporated herein by reference.
(b)Regulations of the Company, as amended and restated October 17, 2018, filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the
Company's Current Report on Form 8-K dated October 17, 2018, and incorporated herein by reference.
4. (a)Indenture between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon (as successor to Chemical Bank),
as trustee, dated as of February 1, 1996, filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form S-3 Registration Statement
Number 333-01093 dated February 20, 1996, and incorporated herein by reference.
(b)Second Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon, as
trustee (including Form of Note), dated as of December 7, 2012, filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company's
Current Report on Form 8-K dated December 4, 2012, and incorporated herein by reference.
(c)Third Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon, as
trustee (including Form of Note), dated as of December 7, 2012, filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company's
Current Report on Form 8-K dated December 4, 2012, and incorporated herein by reference.
(d)Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, dated
July 31, 2015, filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated July 28, 2015,
and incorporated herein by reference.
(e)First Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated July 31, 2015, (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated July 28, 2015, and incorporated herein by reference.
(f)Second Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated July 31, 2015, (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.3 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated July 28, 2015, and incorporated herein by reference.
(g)Third Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated May 16, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 16, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(h)Fourth Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated May 16, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 16, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(i)Fifth Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated May 16, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.3 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 16, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(j)Sixth Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated May 16, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.4 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 16, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
22
(k)Seventh Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated May 16, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.5 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 16, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(l)Eighth Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated June 2, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated June 2, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(m)Ninth Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated June 2, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated June 2, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(n)Tenth Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated June 2, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.3 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated June 2, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(o)Eleventh Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated June 2, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.4 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated June 2, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(p)Twelfth Supplemental Indenture by and between the Company and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee, dated June 2, 2017 (including Form of Note), filed as Exhibit 4.5 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated June 2, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(q)Registration Rights Agreement by and among the Company, as issuer, and each of Citigroup Global
Markets Inc. and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, as dealer managers, dated as of June 2, 2017, filed as
Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated June 2, 2017, and incorporated herein
by reference.
(r)Credit Agreement, dated as of July 19, 2018, by and among the Company, Sherwin-Williams Canada
Inc., Sherwin-Williams Luxembourg S.à r.l. and Sherwin-Williams UK Holding Limited, as borrowers,
the lenders party thereto, the issuing lenders party thereto and Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent,
filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated July 19, 2018, and
incorporated herein by reference.
(s)Credit Agreement, dated as of May 9, 2016, by and among the Company, Citicorp USA, Inc., as
administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 9, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
(t)Agreement for Letter of Credit, dated as of May 9, 2016, by and between the Company and Citibank,
N.A. filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 9, 2016, and
incorporated herein by reference.
(u)Amendment No. 1 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of May 12, 2016, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 12, 2016, and incorporated herein
by reference.
(v)Amendment No. 2 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of June 20, 2016, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated June 20, 2016, and incorporated herein
by reference.
(w)Amendment No. 3 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of August 1, 2016, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated August 1, 2016, and incorporated
herein by reference.
(x)Amendment No. 4 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of January 31, 2017, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated January 31, 2017, and incorporated
herein by reference.
(y)Amendment No. 5 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of February 13, 2017, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated February 13, 2017, and incorporated
herein by reference.
23
(z)Amendment No. 6 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of February 27, 2017, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated February 27, 2017, and incorporated
herein by reference.
(aa)Amendment No. 7 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of May 8, 2017, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 8, 2017, and incorporated herein
by reference.
(bb)Amendment No. 8 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of May 11, 2017, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 11, 2017, and incorporated herein
by reference.
(cc)Amendment No. 9 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of February 27, 2018, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated February 27, 2018, and incorporated
herein by reference.
(dd)Amendment No. 10 to the Credit Agreement, dated as of July 26, 2018, by and among the Company,
Citicorp USA, Inc., as administrative agent and issuing bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated July 26, 2018, and incorporated herein
by reference.
(ee)Amendment No. 1 to the Agreement for Letter of Credit, dated as of July 26, 2018, by and between the
Company and Citibank, N.A., filed as Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarterly period ended September 30, 2018, and incorporated herein by reference.
(ff)Assignable Loan Agreement, dated as of August 17, 2017, relating to a Floating Rate Loan by and
among Sherwin-Williams Coatings S.à r.l., as Borrower, the Company, as Guarantor, and Citibank
Europe plc, UK Branch, as Lender, filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K
dated August 17, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(gg)Assignable Loan Agreement, dated as of August 17, 2017, relating to a Fixed Rate Loan by and among
Sherwin-Williams Coatings S.à r.l., as Borrower, the Company, as Guarantor, and Citibank Europe plc,
UK Branch, as Lender, filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated August
17, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(hh)Credit Agreement, dated as of September 11, 2017, by and among the Company, Goldman Sachs Bank
USA, as administrative agent and Goldman Sachs Mortgage Company, as issuing bank, and the lenders
party thereto, filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated September 11,
2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(ii)Continuing Agreement for Standby Letters of Credit, dated as of September 11, 2017, by and among the
Company and Goldman Sachs Bank USA, filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated September 11, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(jj)First Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of October 30, 2017, by and among the Company,
Goldman Sachs Bank USA, as administrative agent, Goldman Sachs Mortgage Company, as issuing
bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K
dated October 30, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
(kk)Second Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of September 6, 2018, by and among the Company,
Goldman Sachs Bank USA, as administrative agent, Goldman Sachs Mortgage Company, as issuing
bank, and the lenders party thereto, filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K
dated September 6, 2018, and incorporated herein by reference.
(ll)First Amendment to Continuing Agreement for Standby Letters of Credit, dated as of September 6,
2018, by and among the Company and Goldman Sachs Bank USA, filed as Exhibit 4.6 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2018, and
incorporated herein by reference.
10.**(a)Forms of Amended and Restated Severance Agreements filed as Exhibit 10(e) to the Company's Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, and incorporated herein by
reference.
24
**(b)Schedule of Executive Officers who are Parties to the Amended and Restated Severance Agreements in
the forms referred to in Exhibit 10(a) above filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2018, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(c)Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement between the Company and John G. Morikis, dated February 14, 2019
(filed herewith).
**(d)Retention Agreement between the Company and Catherine M. Kilbane, dated June 12, 2017, filed as
Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended June 30,
2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(e)Amended and Restated Employment Agreement between the Company and Aaron M. Erter, dated
August 1, 2017 (filed herewith).
**(f)Amendment to the Amended and Restated Employment Agreement between the Company and Aaron M.
Erter, dated February 13, 2019 (filed herewith).
**(g)The Sherwin-Williams Company 2005 Deferred Compensation Savings and Pension Equalization Plan
(Amended and Restated Effective as of January 1, 2016) filed as Exhibit 10(e) to the Company's Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015, and incorporated herein by
reference.
**(h)The Sherwin-Williams Company 2005 Key Management Deferred Compensation Plan (Amended and
Restated Effective as of January 1, 2016) filed as Exhibit 10(f) to the Company's Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(i)Adoption Agreement for The Valspar Corporation Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan filed as
Exhibit 10.1 to The Valspar Corporation’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 15, 2014, and
incorporated herein by reference.
**(j)The Valspar Corporation Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan filed as Exhibit 10.2 to The Valspar
Corporation’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated May 15, 2014, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(k)Amendment to Valspar Corporation Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan and Adoption
Agreement filed as Exhibit 10.1 to The Valspar Corporation’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated
September 27, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(l)The Sherwin-Williams Company 2005 Director Deferred Fee Plan (Amended and Restated Effective as
of January 1, 2019) (filed herewith).
**(m)The Sherwin-Williams Company Executive Disability Income Plan filed as Exhibit 10(g) to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 1991 (SEC File
Number 001-04851), and incorporated herein by reference.
**(n)Amendment Number One to The Sherwin-Williams Company Executive Disability Income Plan filed as
Exhibit 10(l) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2009, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(o)Summary of The Sherwin-Williams Company Revised Executive Disability Plan filed as Exhibit 10(o)
to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2013, and
incorporated herein by reference.
**(p)The Sherwin-Williams Company 2008 Amended and Restated Executive Life Insurance Plan filed as
Exhibit 10(m) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31,
2009, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(q)Amended and Restated The Valspar Corporation Employee Health Plan filed as Exhibit 10.24 to The
Valspar Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended October 28, 2016, and
incorporated herein by reference.
**(r)The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity and Performance Incentive Plan (Amended and Restated
as of April 19, 2017) filed as Exhibit 10(k) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal
year ended December 31, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
25
**(s)Forms of Stock Option Award under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity and Performance
Incentive Plan filed as Exhibit 10(b) to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly
period ended June 30, 2012, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(t)Forms of Stock Option Award under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity and Performance
Incentive Plan filed as Exhibit 10(z) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year
ended December 31, 2014, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(u)Forms of Stock Option Award under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity and Performance
Incentive Plan filed as Exhibit 10(x) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year
ended December 31, 2015, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(v)Forms of Stock Option Award under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity and Performance
Incentive Plan filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly
period ended September 30, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(w)Forms of Stock Option Award under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity and Performance
Incentive Plan filed as Exhibit 10(p) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year
ended December 31, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(x)Forms of Stock Option Award under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity and Performance
Incentive Plan (filed herewith).
**(y)Form of Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity
and Performance Incentive Plan filed as Exhibit 10(aa) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(z)Form of Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity
and Performance Incentive Plan filed as Exhibit 10(s) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(aa)Form of Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Equity
and Performance Incentive Plan (filed herewith).
**(bb)The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Stock Plan for Nonemployee Directors (Amended and Restated
as of April 20, 2016) filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarterly period ended March 31, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(cc)Form of Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement under The Sherwin-Williams Company 2006 Stock
Plan for Nonemployee Directors filed as Exhibit 10(gg) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(dd)The Sherwin-Williams Company 2007 Executive Annual Performance Bonus Plan (Amended and
Restated as of April 19, 2017) filed as Exhibit 10(w) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the fiscal year ended December 31, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
**(ee)The Valspar Corporation Amended and Restated 2015 Omnibus Equity Plan filed as Exhibit 4(c) to
Form S-8 Registration Statement Number 333-218406 dated June 1, 2017, and incorporated herein by
reference.
**(ff)The Sherwin-Williams Company Key Employee Separation Plan As Amended and Restated Effective
March 1, 2019 (filed herewith).
13. Our 2018 Annual Report, portions of which are incorporated herein by reference (filed herewith). With
the exception of those portions of our 2018 Annual Report that are specifically incorporated by
reference in this report, our 2018 Annual Report shall not be deemed “filed” as part of this report.
18. Preferability Letter of Ernst & Young LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm, regarding
change in accounting principles (filed herewith).
21. Subsidiaries (filed herewith).
23. Consent of Ernst & Young LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (filed herewith).
24. (a)Powers of Attorney (filed herewith).
(b)Certified Resolution Authorizing Signature by Power of Attorney (filed herewith).
31. (a)Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Executive Officer (filed herewith).
(b)Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Financial Officer (filed herewith).
 
26
32. (a)Section 1350 Certification of Chief Executive Officer (furnished herewith).
(b)Section 1350 Certification of Chief Financial Officer (furnished herewith).
101.INS XBRL Instance Document
101.SCH XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.PRE XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
101.CAL XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.LAB XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.DEF XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
* Certain exhibits and schedules have been omitted and the Company agrees to furnish supplementally to the
Securities and Exchange Commission a copy of any omitted exhibits and schedules upon request.
 **Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
27
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Company has duly caused
this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, on February 22, 2019.
 
THE SHERWIN-WILLIAMS COMPANY
 
By:/S/MARY L. GARCEAU
 Mary L. Garceau, Secretary
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities indicated on February 22, 2019.
* JOHN G. MORIKIS Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, Director
(Principal Executive Officer)     John G. Morikis
* ALLEN J. MISTYSYN Senior Vice President – Finance and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)     Allen J. Mistysyn
* JANE M. CRONIN Senior Vice President – Corporate Controller
(Principal Accounting Officer)     Jane M. Cronin
* ARTHUR F . ANT ON Director
    Arthur F. Anton
 
* DA VID F . HODNIK Director
    David F. Hodnik
 
* RICHARD J. KRAMER Director
    Richard J. Kramer
* SUSAN J. KROPF Director
    Susan J. Kropf
 
* CHRISTINE A. POON Director
    Christine A. Poon
* JOHN M. STROPKI Director
    John M. Stropki
* MICHAEL  H. THAMAN Director
    Michael H. Thaman
* MA TTHEW  THORNT ON III Director
    Matthew Thornton III
* STEVEN H. WUNNING Director
    Steven H. Wunning
* The undersigned, by signing her name hereto, does sign this report on behalf of the designated officers and directors of the
Company pursuant to powers of attorney executed on behalf of each such officer and director and filed as an exhibit to this
report.
By:/S/MARY L. GARCEAU
  February 22, 2019
  Mary L. Garceau, Attorney-in-fact    
28
